Utah statutes.
65A-6-6.   Mineral lease covenants.

Each mineral lease shall contain the following covenants:

(1)  the lessee shall promptly pay any rent annually in advance;

(2)  waste may not be committed on the land;

(3)  the premises shall be surrendered at the expiration of the term;

(4)  the lessee may not assign or sublet without the written authorization of the director; and

(5)  where improvements have been placed on the land by any person other than the lessee, the lessee will allow the owner of the improvements to remove them within 90 days.

